Hawaii statutes.
§462A-9 Exhibition of license. A
pilot, on boarding a vessel, and if required by the master thereof, shall
exhibit the pilot's license or a photostatic copy thereof. [L 1978, c 231, pt
of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next